en: Raw Alaska pollock
fr: Lieu d'Alaska cru, Colin d'Alaska cru
it: pollock dell'Alaska crudo

en: Alaskan Pollock fillet
de: Alaska-Seelachsfilet, Alaska Seelachs-Filet
fi: alaskanseitifilee
fr: filet de colin d'Alaska, filets de colin d'alaska, Portions de bloc de filets de COLIN d'Alaska MSC
hr: file aljaske polloke
it: filetti di merluzzo d'alaska
nl: Alaska koolvisfilet
pl: filet z mintaja, filety z mintaja
ro: file de cod Alaska
sv: alaska pollock-filé, filé av alaska pollock

en: anchovy, anchovies
ar: بلمية
az: Ançouslar
bg: аншоа, хамсия
br: Genougamm
ca: Engràulid, anxoves, anxova
cs: sardel obecná
da: ansjos, Ansjoser
de: Sardellen, Serdellen, Anchovis
es: Anchoa, anchoas, anchoveta
fa: موتوماهیان
fi: anjovis, anjovikset
fr: anchois
ga: Ainseabhaí
gl: Engráulidos
he: עפיאניים
hr: inćun
hu: Szardellafélék
id: Teri
io: Anchovo
it: acciughe, alici
ja: アンチョビ
jv: Iwak teri
kk: Анчоус
ko: 멸치과
kw: Lavyn
ky: Анчоус сымалдуулар
la: Engraulidae
lt: Ančiuvinės
mk: сардели
ms: Ikan bilis
nb: ansjos
nl: ansjovis
nn: ansjos
no: ansjos
pl: Sardelowate, anchois
qu: Chuqi challwa
ru: Анчоусовые
su: Teri
sv: ansjovis
ta: நெத்திலி
th: วงศ์ปลาแมว
tl: Dilis
tr: hamsi
uk: Анчоусові
vi: Họ Cá trổng
zh: 鳀科

en: anchovy paste
ca: pasta d'anxova
cs: sardelova pasta
de: Serdellenkreme
es: pasta de anchoa
fi: anjovistahna
fr: pâte d'anchois
hr: pasta od inćuna
it: pasta d'acciughe
nl: ansjovispasta
pl: pasta z anchois

en: anchovy filets
de: Sardellenfilets
es: filetes de anchoas
fi: anjovisfilee
fr: filets d'anchois
hr: filet inćuna, fileti inćuna
it: Filetti d'acciuga

en: marinated anchovy fillets
hr: fileti mariniranih incuna
it: filetti di acciuga marinati

en: European anchovy
be: Еўрапейскі анчоус
br: Genougamm Europa
ca: seitó, seitons
de: Europäische Sardelle
es: boquerón, boquerones
fi: sardelli
fr: anchois commun, Anchois européen, Anchois de l'Afrique australe, Anchois italien
hr: europski inćun
it: European anchovy, acciuga o alice, engraulis encrasicholus
kw: Lavyn europek
la: Engraulis encrasicolus
lt: Europinis ančiuvis
pl: Sardela europejska
ru: Европейский анчоус
uk: Анчоус європейський

en: milkfish
la: Chanos chanos

en: monkfish, anglerfish, angler fish
ar: عفريت البحر
az: Dəniz şeytanı
bg: морски дявол
br: Boultouz
ca: rap
co: Rospu
cs: ďas mořský
cy: Cythraul y Môr
da: Havtaske
de: Seeteufel, Angler, Lotte, Lophius
el: πεσκανδρίτσα
eo: Lofio
es: Rape común, rape
et: Euroopa merikurat
eu: Zapo zuri
fa: ماهی‌گیر
fi: Merikrotti
fo: Havtaska
fr: Baudroie commune
gl: Peixe sapo
he: חכאי גמלוני
hr: grdobina mrkulja
hu: Európai horgászhal
is: Skötuselur
it: Rana Pescatrice
ja: ニシアンコウ
ka: ზღვის ეშმაკი
nb: breiflabb
nl: Zeeduivel
nn: Breiflabb
pl: Żabnica
pt: Peixe-pescador
ro: Dracul de mare
ru: Европейский удильщик
sh: Grdobina mrkulja
sl: Morska žaba
sv: Marulk
tr: Fener balığı
uk: Морський чорт
zh: 釣鮟鱇

en: American anglerfish
la: Lophius piscatorius

en: European anglerfish monkfish
la: Lophius americanus

en: Atlantic wolffish
ar: عريك أطلسي
bg: ивичеста зъбатка
ca: peix llop
cs: vlkouš obecný
cy: Morflaidd
da: Havkat
de: Gestreifter Seewolf
fa: گرگ‌ماهی اطلسی
fi: Merikissa
fo: Steinbítur
fr: loup d'atlantique
ga: Cat mara an Atlantaigh
he: דג זאב אטלנטי
hr: atlantski vuk
is: Steinbítur
it: lupo Atlantico
la: Anarhichas lupus
lt: Paprastoji vilkžuvė
mk: морски волк
nb: Gråsteinbit
nl: Zeewolf
pl: Zębacz pasiasty
ru: Полосатая зубатка
se: Stáinnir
sr: Морски вук
sv: Havskatt

en: Raw Atlantic bass
fr: Bar cru, Loup de l'Atlantique
it: branzino crudo dell'Atlantico

en: Spotted wolffish
fr: Loup tacheté
it: pesce lupo maculato

en: Raw Spotted wolffish
fr: Loup tacheté cru
it: pesce lupo maculato crudo

en: blue whiting, Micromesistius poutassou
bg: синя северна треска, Micromesistius poutassou
br: Merlank glas, Micromesistius poutassou
ca: maire, Micromesistius poutassou
cy: Swtan Glas, Micromesistius poutassou
de: Blauer Wittling, Micromesistius poutassou
eu: Bakalada, Micromesistius poutassou
fa: سفیدگون آبی, Micromesistius poutassou
fi: Mustakitaturska, Micromesistius poutassou
fo: Svartkjaftur, Micromesistius poutassou
fr: merlan bleu, Micromesistius poutassou
gl: Lirio, Micromesistius poutassou
hr: plavušicu
hu: Kék puha tőkehal, Micromesistius poutassou
is: Kolmunni, Micromesistius poutassou
it: melù
la: Micromesistius poutassou, Micromesistius spp
nl: Blauwe wijting, Micromesistius poutassou
nn: Kolmule, Micromesistius poutassou
pl: Błękitek, Micromesistius poutassou
sv: Kolmule, Micromesistius poutassou
uk: Путасу північна, Micromesistius poutassou
zh: 藍鱈, Micromesistius poutassou

en: bluefish
la: Pomatomus saltatrix

en: bogue
ar: سمكة موزة
bg: гопа
ca: boga, bogarró
cy: pysgodyn llygad-llo
de: Gelbstriemenbrasse
el: γόπα
es: boga
eu: boga
fi: boga
fr: bogue
gl: boga
he: גובוס גלילי
hr: bukva
it: boga
la: Boops boops
nb: okseøyefisk
nl: bokvis
pl: bops, złotokres
pt: boga, boga-do-mar
ru: бопс, полосатик, большеглазый боопс
sh: bukva
sl: bukva
sv: oxögonfisk
tr: kupes
uk: бопс великоокий, бопс смугастий
zh: 牛眼鯛

en: burbot
ar: بربوط
ba: Шамбы
be: мянтуз
bg: михалца
ca: lota
ce: Налим
cs: mník jednovousý
cy: Penfras Dŵr Croyw
da: Knude
de: Quappe
eo: Lojto
et: made
fa: ماهی ریشدار
fi: made
fr: lotte
ga: Breac beadaí
hr: manić
hu: Menyhal
hy: շերեփաձուկ
in: Tittaaliq
io: Lotao
it: bottatrice
ja: カワメンタイ
ka: ღლაბუტა
kk: Нәлім
la: lota lota
lt: Vėgėlė
nb: lake
nl: kwabaal
nn: lake
pl: Miętus pospolity
ru: налим
sh: Manić
sr: Манић
sv: Lake
tr: Tatlı su gelinciği
tt: Шамбы
ud: Нальым
uk: минь річковий
vi: Cá tuyết sông
zh: 江鱈

en: escolar
la: Lepidocybium flavobrunneum